North Carolina statutes. Chapter 126. North Carolina Human Resources Act.
Article 16. Flexible Compensation Plan.

§ 126-95.
Flexible compensation plan.

The Director of the Budget may provide eligible officers and employees of State departments, institutions, and agencies not covered by the provisions of

G.S. 116-17.2

a program of dependent care assistance as available under section 129 and related sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The Director of the Budget may authorize State departments, institutions, and agencies to enter into annual agreements with employees who elect to participate in the program to provide for a reduction in salary. With the approval of the Director of the Budget, savings in the employer’s share of contributions under the Federal Insurance Contributions Act on account of the reduction in salary may be used to pay some or all of the administrative expenses of the program. Should the Director of the Budget decide to contract with a third party to administer the terms and conditions of a program of dependent care assistance, the Director of the Budget may select a contractor only upon a thorough and completely competitive procurement process.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law relating to the salaries of officers and employees of departments, institutions, and agencies of State government, the Director of the Budget may provide a plan of flexible compensation to eligible officers and employees of State departments, institutions, and agencies not covered by the provisions of

G.S. 116-17.2

for benefits available under section 125 and related sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. This plan shall not replace, substitute for, or duplicate any benefits provided to employees and officers under Article 1A of Chapter 120 of the General Statutes and Articles 1, 3B, 4, and 6 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes. The plan may, however, include offerings for products and benefits that are supplemental or additional to these statutory benefits. If a plan of flexible compensation is offered, then a TRICARE supplement shall be offered. In providing a plan of flexible compensation, the Director of the Budget may authorize State departments, institutions, and agencies to enter into agreements with their employees for reductions in the salaries of employees electing to participate in the plan of flexible compensation provided by this section. With the approval of the Director of the Budget, savings in the employer’s share of contributions under the Federal Insurance Contributions Act on account of the reduction in salary may be used to pay some or all of the administrative expenses of the program. Should the Director of the Budget decide to contract with a third party to administer the terms and conditions of a plan of flexible compensation as provided by this section, it may select such a contractor only upon a thorough and completely advertised competitive procurement process.

As used in this section, the term “eligible officers and employees” means any officer or employee authorized to participate in the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, the Legislative Retirement System, and the State Health Plan.

History.

2007-117, s. 3; 2013-292, s. 4; 2013-382, s. 1.4; 2019-152, s. 2.

§§ 126-96 through 126-99.

Reserved for future codification purposes.